North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-33 Nonprofit Corporations
10-33-89.
Abandonment.

After a plan of merger or consolidation has been approved by each constituent corporation under section 10-33-87 and before the effective date of the plan, it may be abandoned:

If each constituent corporation has approved the abandonment at a meeting:

By a majority of the members with voting rights voting on the issue; or

If the corporation does not have voting members, by a majority of all directors; or

If the plan itself provides for abandonment and the conditions for abandonment in the plan are met.

A plan of merger or consolidation may be abandoned after it has been approved by each constituent corporation and before the effective date of the plan, by a resolution approved by a majority of all directors of the constituent corporation abandoning the plan of merger or consolidation, subject to the contract rights of any other person under the plan.

If articles of merger or consolidation have been filed with the secretary of state, but have not yet become effective, articles of abandonment that comply with subsection 4 must be filed with the secretary of state by:

The constituent corporations, in the case of abandonment under subdivision a of subsection 1;

The constituent corporations or any one of them, in the case of abandonment under subdivision b of subsection 1; or

The abandoning corporation in the case of abandonment under subsection 2.

The articles of abandonment must contain:

The names of the constituent corporations;

The provision of this section under which the plan is abandoned; and

If the plan is abandoned under subsection 2, the text of the resolution approved by the directors abandoning the plan.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-90.
Effective date of merger or consolidation — Effect.

A merger or consolidation is effective when the articles of merger or consolidation are filed with the secretary of state or on a later date named in the articles.

When a merger or consolidation becomes effective:

The constituent corporations become a single corporation, which, in case of merger, is a surviving corporation or, in case of consolidation, is a new corporation.

Subject to subdivision c and section 10-33-91, and except for the surviving corporation, the separate existence of the constituent corporations ends.

When the agreement of merger or consolidation expressly provides for the continuance of the corporate existence of a constituent corporation and expressly declares the purpose for the continuance, the corporate existence of the constituent corporation continues in the single corporation for the purpose declared in the agreement.

The single corporation has the rights, privileges, immunities, and powers, and is subject to the duties and liabilities, of a corporation formed under this chapter.

The single corporation has the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and franchises, public and private, of each constituent corporation.

All real or personal property, debts, including debts arising from a subscription for membership, and interests belonging to each constituent corporation are transferred to the single corporation without further act or deed.

Interest in real estate possessed by a constituent corporation does not revert to the grantor, or otherwise, nor is it in any way impaired by reason of the merger or consolidation; and the personal property of a constituent corporation does not revert by reason of the merger or consolidation.

Except when the will or other instrument provides otherwise, and subject to section 10-33-95, a devise, bequest, gift, or grant contained in a will or other instrument, in trust or otherwise, made before or after the merger or consolidation has become effective, to or for any of the constituent corporations, inures to the single corporation.

Debts, liabilities, and obligations of each constituent corporation become the debts, liabilities, and obligations of the single corporation, just as if the debts, liabilities, and obligations had been incurred or contracted by the single corporation.

Existing claims or a pending action or proceeding by or against a constituent corporation may be prosecuted to judgment as though the merger or consolidation had not been effected, or the single corporation may be substituted for the constituent corporation.

The liabilities of the members, officers, directors, or similar groups or persons, however denominated, of a constituent corporation are not affected by the merger or consolidation of a constituent corporation.

The rights of creditors or liens upon the property of a constituent corporation are not impaired by the merger or consolidation, but the liens are limited to the property upon which they were liens immediately before the merger or consolidation.

The articles of the surviving corporation are considered to be amended to the extent that changes in its articles are contained in a plan of merger.

In the case of a consolidation, the plan of consolidation constitutes the articles of incorporation of the new corporation.

For purposes of this subsection, “fiduciary capacity” means the capacity of a trustee, executor, administrator, personal representative, guardian, conservator, receiver, escrow agent, agent for the investment of money, attorney in fact, or a similar capacity.

Except when the will, declaration of trust, or other instrument provides otherwise, the single corporation is, without further act or deed, the successor of the constituent corporation in the fiduciary capacity in which a constituent corporation was acting at the time of the merger or consolidation and is liable to any beneficiary as fully as if the constituent corporation had continued its separate corporate existence.

If a constituent corporation is nominated and appointed, or has been nominated and appointed, in a fiduciary capacity in a will, declaration of trust, or other instrument, order, or judgment before or after the merger or consolidation, then even if the will or other instrument, order, or judgment does not become operative or effective until after the merger or consolidation becomes effective, every fiduciary capacity and the rights, powers, privileges, duties, discretions, and responsibilities provided for in the nomination or appointment fully vest in and are to be exercised by the single corporation, whether there are one or more successive mergers or consolidations.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-91.
Continuance of corporate authority.

When an act or instrument is considered necessary or appropriate to evidence the vesting of property or other rights in the single corporation, the persons with authority to do so under the articles or bylaws of each constituent corporation shall do the act or execute and deliver the instrument and for this purpose, the existence of the constituent corporations and the authority of those persons is continued.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-92.
Merger or consolidation with foreign corporation.

A corporation may merge or consolidate with a foreign corporation by following the procedures set forth in this section, if the merger or consolidation is permitted by the laws of the state under which the foreign corporation is incorporated.

Each corporation shall comply with sections 10-33-85 through 10-33-91 with respect to the merger or consolidation of corporations and each foreign corporation shall comply with the laws under which it was incorporated or by which it is governed.

If the single corporation will be incorporated under this chapter, it shall comply with this chapter.

If the single corporation will be a foreign corporation and will conduct activities in this state, then it shall comply with the provisions of sections 10-33-125 through 10-33-138 with respect to foreign corporations. In every case the single corporation shall file with the secretary of state:

An agreement that it may be served with process in this state in a proceeding for the enforcement of an obligation of a constituent corporation; and

An irrevocable appointment of the secretary of state as its agent to accept service of process in any proceeding and an address to which process may be forwarded as provided in section 10-01.1-13.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2007, ch. 99, § 45.

10-33-93.
Merger of corporation conducting activities as a hospital with a corporation organized for profit — Retention of property tax status.

Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 10-19.1 and this chapter, a corporation conducting activities as a hospital may merge with a corporation incorporated for profit and form a corporation incorporated under this chapter.

Notwithstanding chapter 57-02 or any other provision of law, any interest in property of corporations merging under this section retains the same property tax status after the merger as it had in the taxable year before the merger.

Notwithstanding chapter 57-39.2 or 57-40.2 or any other provision of law, the sale, purchase, or use of any property by a corporation merging under this section retains the same status under the sales and use tax laws after the merger as it would have had before the merger.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2003, ch. 85, § 108.

10-33-94.
Transfer of assets — When permitted.

A corporation may sell, lease, transfer, dispose of, or grant a security interest in all or substantially all of the property and assets only as provided in this section.

Unless otherwise provided in its articles or bylaws, a corporation, by affirmative vote of a majority of directors, may sell, lease, transfer, or dispose of all or substantially all of its property and assets in the usual and regular course of its activities, upon those terms and conditions and for those considerations, which may be money, securities, or other instruments for the payment of money or other property, as the board considers expedient. Member approval is not required under this subsection.

A corporation, by affirmative vote of a majority of all directors, may sell, lease, transfer, or dispose of all or substantially all of its property and assets, including its goodwill, not in the usual and regular course of its activities, upon those terms and conditions and for those considerations, which may be money, securities, or other instruments for the payment of money or other property, as the board considers expedient.

If there are members with voting rights, then the sale, lease, transfer, or disposition must be submitted to the members under subdivision c. If there are not members with voting rights, then member approval is not required.

Written notice of the meeting must be given to each member with voting rights within the time and in the manner provided in section 10-33-68 for notice of meetings of members.

Whether the meeting is an annual or special meeting, the notice must state that a purpose of the meeting is to consider the sale, lease, transfer, or other disposition of all or substantially all of the property and assets of the corporation. The sale, lease, transfer, or disposition must be approved at a regular or special meeting of the members by the affirmative vote of the majority of the members with voting rights voting on the action.

Unless otherwise provided in its articles or bylaws and subject to subsection 1 of section 10-33-82, a corporation may, by the affirmative vote of a majority of directors, grant a security interest in all or substantially all of its property and assets whether in the usual and regular course of its activities, upon those terms and conditions and for those considerations, which may be money, securities, or other instruments for the payment of money or other property as the board considers expedient. Member approval is not required under this subsection.

If applicable, a corporation shall comply with sections 10-33-122 and 10-33-144 before selling, leasing, transferring, or disposing of all or substantially all of the corporation’s assets under this section.

Confirmatory deeds, assignments, or similar instruments to evidence a sale, lease, transfer, or other disposition may be signed and delivered at any time in the name of the transferor by its current officers or, if the corporation no longer exists, by its last officers.

The transferee is liable for the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the transferor only to the extent provided in the contract or agreement between the transferee and the transferor or to the extent provided by this chapter or other statutes of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 1999, ch. 97, § 3; 2011, ch. 87, § 57.

10-33-95.
Certain assets not to be diverted.

If a corporation dissolves, merges, substantially changes the use or purposes for which the corporation will use corporate assets, consolidates, transfers corporate assets, or grants a mortgage or other security interest in corporate assets, assets of the corporation or a constituent corporation and assets subsequently received by a single corporation after a merger or consolidation may not be diverted from the uses and purposes for which the assets were received and held or from the uses and purposes expressed or intended by the original donor.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 1999, ch. 95, § 142.

10-33-96.
Methods of dissolution.

Subject to section 10-33-122, a corporation may be dissolved:

By the incorporators under section 10-33-97;

By the board and members with voting rights under sections 10-33-98 through 10-33-103; or

By order of a court under sections 10-33-106 through 10-33-113.

A corporation also may be dissolved by the secretary of state under section 10-33-139.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-97.
Voluntary dissolution by incorporators.

If the first board has not been named in the articles, designated or appointed pursuant to the articles, or elected under section 10-33-25, a corporation may be dissolved by the incorporators as provided in this section.

A majority of the incorporators shall sign articles of dissolution containing:

The name of the corporation;

The date of incorporation;

A statement that the first board has not been:

Named in the articles;

Designated or appointed pursuant to the articles; or

Elected at an organizational meeting;

A statement that no debts remain unpaid; and

A statement:

That notice to the attorney general required by section 10-33-122 has been given and the waiting period:

Has expired; or

Has been waived by the attorney general; or

That section 10-33-122 is not applicable.

The articles of dissolution must be filed with the secretary of state together with the fees provided in section 10-33-140.

When the articles of dissolution have been filed with the secretary of state, the corporation is dissolved.

The secretary of state shall issue to the dissolved corporation a certificate of dissolution that contains:

The name of the corporation;

The date the articles of dissolution were filed with the secretary of state; and

A statement that the corporation is dissolved.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-98.
Voluntary dissolution by board and members with voting rights.

A corporation may be dissolved by the board and members with voting rights as provided in this section.

The board shall adopt a resolution proposing dissolution of the corporation by the affirmative vote of a majority of all directors.

The resolution must include a plan of dissolution that states to whom the assets owned or held by the corporation will be distributed after creditors are paid.

The plan must comply with the requirements of section 10-33-105.

If the board will have discretion in distributing assets, the plan must state that the assets will be distributed to persons the board subsequently identifies.

If there is a member with voting rights, the resolution and plan of dissolution must be submitted to the members under subsection 3.

With respect to approval by members with voting rights:

Written notice:

Must be given to each member with voting rights, within the time and in the manner provided in section 10-33-68 for notice of meetings of members; and

Whether the meeting is a regular or a special meeting, must state that a purpose of the meeting is to consider dissolving the corporation.

The proposed dissolution must be submitted for approval at a meeting of members. If the proposed dissolution is approved by the members with voting rights, the dissolution must be started.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2011, ch. 87, § 58.

10-33-99.
Filing notice of intent to dissolve — Effect.

If dissolution of the corporation is approved under section 10-33-98, the corporation shall:

File with the secretary of state, together with the fees provided in section 10-33-140, a notice of intent to dissolve which must contain:

The name of the corporation;

The date and place of the meeting at which the resolution was approved by the board under subsection 2 of section 10-33-98, and by the members under subsection 3 of section 10-33-98, if applicable; and

A statement that the requisite approval of the directors and members was received.

If applicable, notify the attorney general under section 10-33-122.

When the notice of intent to dissolve has been filed with the secretary of state and subject to section 10-33-104, the corporation may not carry on its activities, except to the extent necessary for the winding up of the corporation.

The board and members with voting rights have the right to revoke the dissolution proceedings under section 10-33-104.

The members with voting rights have the right to remove directors or fill vacancies on the board.

The corporate existence continues to the extent necessary to wind up the affairs of the corporation until the dissolution proceedings are revoked or articles of dissolution are filed with the secretary of state.

The filing with the secretary of state of a notice of intent to dissolve does not affect a remedy in favor of the corporation or a remedy against it or its directors, officers, or members in those capacities, except as provided in section 10-33-115.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-100.
Procedure in dissolution.

When a notice of intent to dissolve has been filed with the secretary of state, the board, or the officers acting under the direction of the board, shall proceed as soon as possible to collect or make provision for the collection of debts owing to the corporation and to pay or make provision for the payment of debts, obligations, and liabilities of the corporation according to their priorities.

Notwithstanding section 10-33-94, when a notice of intent to dissolve has been filed with the secretary of state, the directors may sell, lease, transfer, or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of the property and assets of a dissolving corporation without a vote of the members, subject to sections 10-33-95 and 10-33-122.

Property must be distributed under section 10-33-105.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2017, ch. 84, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

10-33-101.
Dissolution procedure for corporations that give notice to creditors and claimants.

When a notice of intent to dissolve has been filed with the secretary of state and the attorney general, if applicable, the corporation may give notice of the filing to each creditor of and claimant against the corporation known or unknown, present or future, and contingent or noncontingent.

If notice to creditors and claimants is given, it must be given:

By publishing the notice once each week for four successive weeks in an official newspaper, as defined in chapter 46-06, in the county or counties where the registered office and the principal executive office of the corporation are located; and

By giving written notice to known creditors and claimants pursuant to subsection 26 of section 10-33-01.

The notice to creditors and claimants must contain:

A statement that the corporation is in the process of dissolving;

A statement that the corporation has filed with the secretary of state a notice of intent to dissolve;

The date of filing the notice of intent to dissolve;

The address of the office to which written claims against the corporation must be presented; and

The date by which all the claims must be received, which must be the later of:

Ninety days after published notice; or

With respect to a particular known creditor or claimant, ninety days after the date on which written notice was given to that creditor or claimant.

Published notice is deemed given on the date of first publication for the purpose of determining this date.

With respect to claims against a corporation that gives notice to creditors and claimants:

The corporation has thirty days from the receipt of each claim filed according to the procedures set forth by the corporation on or before the date set forth in the notice to accept or reject the claim by giving written notice to the person submitting it. A claim not expressly rejected in this manner is deemed accepted.

A creditor or claimant to whom notice is given and whose claim is rejected by the corporation has:

Sixty days from the date of rejection;

One hundred eighty days from the date the corporation filed with the secretary of state the notice of intent to dissolve; or

Ninety days after the date on which notice was given to the creditor or claimant, whichever is longer, to pursue any other remedies with respect to the claim.

A creditor or claimant to whom notice is given who fails to file a claim according to the procedures set forth by the corporation on or before the date set forth in the notice is barred from suing on that claim or otherwise realizing upon it or enforcing it, except as provided in section 10-33-115.

A creditor or claimant whose claim is rejected by the corporation under subdivision b is barred from suing on that claim or otherwise realizing upon or enforcing it, if the creditor or claimant does not initiate legal, administrative, or arbitration proceedings with respect to the claim within the time provided in subdivision b.

Articles of dissolution for a corporation dissolving under this section that has given notice to creditors and claimants must be filed with the secretary of state after compliance with section 10-33-122, if applicable, and:

The ninety-day period in subdivision a of subsection 2 has expired and the payment of claims of all creditors and claimants filing a claim within that period has been made or provided for; or

The longest of the periods described in subdivision b of subsection 3 has expired and there are no pending legal, administrative, or arbitration proceedings by or against the corporation commenced within the time provided in subdivision b of subsection 3.

The articles of dissolution for a corporation that has given notice to creditors and claimants under this section must state:

The last date on which the notice was given and:

That the payment of all creditors and claimants filing a claim within the ninety-day period in subdivision a of subsection 2 has been made or provided for; or

The date on which the longest of the periods described in subdivision b of subsection 3 expired;

That the remaining property, assets, and claims of the corporation have been distributed in accordance with section 10-33-105, or that adequate provision has been made for that distribution; and

That there are no pending legal, administrative, or arbitration proceedings by or against the corporation commenced within the time provided in subdivision b of subsection 3, or that adequate provision has been made for the satisfaction of any judgment, order, or decree that may be entered against it in a pending proceeding.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2003, ch. 85, § 109.

10-33-102.
Dissolution procedure for corporations that do not give notice to creditors and claimants.

When a notice of intent to dissolve has been filed with the secretary of state and the attorney general, if applicable, and the corporation has elected not to give notice to creditors and claimants in the manner provided in section 10-33-101:

Articles of dissolution for a corporation that has not given notice to creditors and claimants in the manner provided in section 10-33-101:

Must be filed with the secretary of state after compliance with section 10-33-122, if applicable, and:

The payment of claims of all known creditors and claimants has been made or provided for; or

At least two years have elapsed from the date of filing the notice of intent to dissolve.

Must state:

If the articles of dissolution are being filed pursuant to paragraph 1 of subdivision a, that all known debts, obligations, and liabilities of the corporation have been paid and discharged or that adequate provision has been made for payment or discharge;

That the remaining property, assets, and claims of the corporation have been distributed in accordance with section 10-33-105, or that adequate provision has been made for that distribution; and

There are no pending legal, administrative, or arbitration proceedings by or against the corporation, or that adequate provision has been made for the satisfaction of any judgment, order, or decree that may be entered against it in a pending proceeding.

With respect to claims against corporations that do not give notice to creditors and claimants under section 10-33-101:

If a corporation has paid or provided for all known creditors or claimants at the time articles of dissolution are filed, a creditor or claimant who does not file a claim or pursue a remedy, in a legal, administrative, or arbitration proceeding within two years after the date of filing the notice of intent to dissolve is barred from suing on that claim or otherwise realizing upon or enforcing it.

If the corporation has not paid or provided for all known creditors and claimants at the time articles of dissolution are filed, a person who does not file a claim or pursue a remedy in a legal, administrative, or arbitration proceeding within two years after the date of filing the notice of intent to dissolve is barred from suing on that claim or otherwise realizing upon or enforcing it, except as provided in section 10-33-115.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-103.
Filing of articles of dissolution — Effective date of dissolution — Certificate of dissolution.

An original of the articles of dissolution must be filed with the secretary of state, together with the fees provided in section 10-33-140. If the secretary of state finds that the articles of dissolution conform, the secretary of state shall issue a certificate of dissolution.

When the certificate of dissolution has been issued by the secretary of state, or on a later date within thirty days after filing if the articles of dissolution so provide, the corporation is dissolved.

The secretary of state shall issue to the dissolved corporation, or its legal representative, a certificate of dissolution that contains:

The name of the corporation;

The date the articles of dissolution are effective; and

A statement that the corporation was dissolved as of the effective date of dissolution.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2003, ch. 85, § 110.

10-33-104.
Revocation of dissolution proceedings.

As provided in this section, dissolution proceedings begun under section 10-33-98 may be revoked before the articles of dissolution are filed.

The board may adopt a resolution revoking the proposed dissolution by the affirmative vote of a majority of all directors. If there are members with voting rights, the resolution must be submitted to the members under subsection 3.

Written notice must be given to the members with voting rights within the time and in the manner provided in section 10-33-68 for notice of meetings of members and must state that a purpose of the meeting is to consider the advisability of revoking the dissolution proceedings.

The proposed revocation must be submitted to the members at the meeting.

If the proposed revocation is approved by the members with voting rights, the dissolution proceedings are revoked.

Revocation of dissolution proceedings is effective when a notice of revocation is filed with the secretary of state.

After the notice is filed, the corporation may resume its activities.

If notice to the attorney general has been given under section 10-33-122, the notice of revocation also must be given to the attorney general on or before the time that it is filed with the secretary of state.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2003, ch. 85, § 111.

10-33-105.
Distribution of assets.

In performing the duties under section 10-33-100, the board, or the officers acting under the direction of the board, shall distribute the assets of the corporation in the following order of priority:

Distribution of assets received and held for a special use or purpose under subsection 2;

Payment of costs and expenses of the dissolution proceedings, including attorney’s fees and disbursements;

Payment of debts, obligations, and liabilities of the corporation;

Distribution of assets pursuant to articles or bylaws of the dissolving corporation or the rules or canons of another organization under subsection 3; and

Distribution of remaining assets under subsection 4.

Assets of the corporation may not be diverted from the uses and purposes for which the assets have been received and held or from the uses and purposes expressed or intended by the original donor.

When the articles or bylaws of the dissolving corporation, or the rules or canons of another organization by which the dissolving corporation is bound, provide for a particular distribution of the assets of the dissolving corporation, the assets must be distributed accordingly.

The distribution of assets held for or devoted to a charitable or public use or purpose is subject to section 59-20-01.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2007, ch. 549, § 3.

10-33-106.
Supervised voluntary dissolution.

After the notice of intent to dissolve has been filed with the secretary of state and before a certificate of dissolution has been issued, the corporation, the attorney general, or, for good cause, a creditor, or at least fifty members with voting rights or ten percent of the members with voting rights, whichever is less, may apply to a court within the county in which the principal executive office of the corporation is located to have the dissolution conducted or continued under the supervision of the court under sections 10-33-107 through 10-33-113.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-107.
Involuntary dissolution.

A court may grant equitable relief it considers just and reasonable in the circumstances or may dissolve a corporation and liquidate its assets and activities:

In a supervised voluntary dissolution under section 10-33-106.

In an action by a director or at least fifty members with voting rights or ten percent of the members with voting rights, whichever is less, when it is established that:

The directors or the persons having the authority otherwise vested in the board are deadlocked in the management of the corporate affairs, the members cannot break the deadlock, and the corporation or the parties have not provided for a procedure to resolve the dispute;

The directors or those in control of the corporation have acted fraudulently, illegally, or in a manner unfairly prejudicial toward one or more members in their capacities as members, directors, or officers;

The members of the corporation are so divided in voting power that, for a period that includes the time when two consecutive regular meetings were held, they have failed to elect successors to directors whose terms have expired or would have expired upon the election and qualification of their successors;

The corporate assets are being misapplied or wasted; or

The period of duration as provided in the articles has expired and has not been extended as provided in section 10-33-118.

In an action by a creditor when:

The claim of the creditor has been reduced to judgment and an execution on it has been returned unsatisfied; or

The corporation has admitted in writing that the claim of the creditor is due and owing and it is established that the corporation cannot pay its debts in the ordinary course of its activities.

In an action by the attorney general when it is established that:

The articles and certificate of incorporation were obtained through fraud;

The corporation should not have been formed under this chapter;

The corporation failed to comply with the requirements of sections 10-33-02 through 10-33-19 essential to incorporation under or election to become governed by this chapter;

The corporation has flagrantly violated a provision of this chapter, has violated a provision of this chapter more than once, or has violated more than one provision of this chapter;

The corporation has engaged in an unauthorized act, contract, conveyance, or transfer or has exceeded its powers;

The corporation has acted, or failed to act, in a manner that constitutes surrender or abandonment of the corporate purpose, franchise, privileges, or enterprise;

The corporation has liabilities and obligations exceeding the corporate assets;

The period of corporate existence has ended without extension;

The corporation has failed for a period of ninety days to pay fees, charges, or penalties required by this chapter;

The corporation has failed for a period of thirty days:

To appoint and maintain a registered agent in this state as provided in chapter 10-01.1; or

After changing its registered office, to file with the secretary of state a statement of the change as provided in chapter 10-01.1;

The corporation has answered falsely or failed to answer a reasonable written interrogatory from the secretary of state or the attorney general to the corporation, its officers, or directors;

The corporation has solicited property and has failed to use it for the purpose solicited; or

The corporation has fraudulently used or solicited property.

An action may not be commenced under subdivision d until thirty days after notice to the corporation by the attorney general of the reason for the filing of the action. If the reason for filing the action is an act that the corporation has done, or omitted to do, and the act or omission may be corrected by an amendment of the articles or bylaws or by performance of or abstention from the act, the attorney general shall give the corporation thirty additional days in which to effect the correction before filing the action.

In determining whether to order equitable relief or dissolution under this section, the court shall consider the financial condition of the corporation but may not refuse to order equitable relief or dissolution solely on the ground that the corporation is solvent.

In deciding whether to order dissolution, the court shall consider whether lesser relief suggested by one or more parties, such as any form of equitable relief or a partial liquidation, would be adequate to permanently relieve the circumstances established under subdivision b, c, or d of subsection 1. Lesser relief may be ordered if it would be appropriate under the facts and circumstances of the case.

If the court finds that a party to a proceeding brought under this section has acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or otherwise not in good faith, it may award reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees and disbursements, to any of the other parties.

Proceedings under this section must be brought in a court within the county in which the principal executive office of the corporation is located. It is not necessary to make members parties to the action or proceeding unless relief is sought against them personally.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2003, ch. 85, § 112; 2007, ch. 99, § 46.

10-33-108.
Procedure in involuntary or supervised voluntary dissolution.

In dissolution proceedings the court may issue injunctions, appoint receivers with all powers and duties the court directs, take other actions required to preserve the corporate assets wherever situated, and carry on the activities of the corporation until a full hearing can be held.

When a proceeding involving a corporation described in subsection 1 of section 10-33-122 is begun, the court shall order that a copy of the petition be served on the attorney general. In all proceedings under this section, the attorney general has a right to participate as a party.

After a full hearing has been held, upon whatever notice the court directs to be given to all parties to the proceedings and to any other parties in interest designated by the court, the court may appoint a receiver to collect the corporate assets. A receiver has authority, subject to the order of the court, to continue the activities of the corporation and to sell, lease, transfer, or otherwise dispose of all or any of the property and assets of the corporation either at public or private sale.

The assets of the corporation or the proceeds resulting from a sale, lease, transfer, or other disposition must be applied in the following order of priority to the payment and discharge of:

Assets received and held for a special use or purpose must be distributed pursuant to subsection 2 of section 10-33-105;

The costs and expenses of the proceedings, including attorney’s fees and disbursements;

Debts, taxes, and assessments due the United States, this state and its subdivisions, and other states and their subdivisions, in that order;

Claims duly proved and allowed to employees under title 65. Claims under this subdivision may not be allowed if the corporation carried workforce safety and insurance coverage, as provided by law, at the time the injury was sustained;

Claims, including the value of all compensation paid in any medium other than money, duly proved and allowed to employees for services performed within three months preceding the appointment of the receiver, if any; and

Other claims duly proved and allowed.

After payment of the expenses of receivership and claims of creditors duly proved, the remaining assets, if any, must be distributed in accordance with section 10-33-105.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2003, ch. 85, § 113; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2017, ch. 84, § 3, effective August 1, 2017.

10-33-109.
Qualifications of receivers — Powers.

A receiver must be an individual or organization authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state. A receiver shall give bond as directed by the court with the sureties required by the court.

A receiver may sue and defend in all courts as receiver of the corporation. The court appointing the receiver has exclusive jurisdiction of the corporation and its property.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.

10-33-110.
Filing claims in proceedings to dissolve.

In proceedings referred to in section 10-33-107 to dissolve a corporation, the court may require all creditors and claimants of the corporation to file their claims under oath with the clerk of court or with the receiver in a form prescribed by the court.

If the court requires the filing of claims, it shall fix a date, which may not be less than one hundred twenty days from the date of the order, as the last day for the filing of claims, and shall prescribe the notice of the fixed date that must be given to creditors and claimants. Before the fixed date, the court may extend the time for filing claims. Creditors and claimants failing to file claims on or before the fixed date may be barred, by order of court, from claiming an interest in or receiving payment out of the property or assets of the corporation.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 105, § 1.